California statutes. Water Code
The maintenance fund, except as provided in Section 51547, shall be disbursed only upon warrants of the board drawn in payment of the cost or expense of maintenance, repair and operation of the district reclamation works, incidental expenses as defined in Section 51336 and for the construction of reclamation works supplemental to, or in replacement of, the reclamation works already possessed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51547.

When time warrants have been issued in anticipation of an operation and maintenance assessment levy, money collected upon that levy shall be used only for the payment of the principal and interest on the time warrants so long as such time warrants are outstanding and unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Installments Called to Pay Bonds [51560. - 51563.]

51560.

The installment of an assessment called to pay principal or interest on bonds pursuant to Section 51420 may be paid in cash or in bonds of the district, or their interest coupons, issued upon the assessment, which are matured or will mature within 90 days from the date of the calling of the installment, or part in cash and part in bonds or coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51561.

Bonds and interest coupons received in payment for the assessment shall be accepted at face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51562.

Any bond or coupon received in payment for such an installment shall be canceled forthwith by the county treasurer and filed in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51563.

Any part of the installment or any interest thereon which is unpaid at the expiration of 30 days from the date of the notice calling the installment, is delinquent, and 10 percent of the unpaid amount of the installment shall be added thereto and collected by the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Removal of Lien [51570. - 51570.]

51570.

Any landowner who desires to lessen or remove the lien upon his land of any assessment on which bonds have been issued may deliver to the county treasurer for cancellation any bonds payable out of the assessment, and the treasurer shall credit against the assessment on his land the principal and accrued interest of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Delinquency Sales [51600. - 51656.]



  ARTICLE 1. Delinquency Sales on Unbonded Assessments [51600. - 51618.]

51600.

(a) After any installment of an unpaid assessment on which bonds have not been issued has become delinquent, the county treasurer may, only upon the request of the district, publish once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county where delinquency exists a notice containing a list of all delinquencies in the county. At the same time as the publication, the county treasurer shall mail the notice to the last known address of the property owner, as shown on the latest county tax roll. 

(b) No property may be sold pursuant to this article in the absence of publication and notice to the owner pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51601.

The notice shall contain the following:

(a) A description of the parcels assessed, as described in the assessment list or operation and maintenance assessment roll or by reference number as set forth in the assessment list or roll on file in the office of the county treasurer (stating the date and time the list or roll was so filed), or by other appropriate reference thereto sufficient to identify the parcel, and shall refer to the assessment list or roll for further particulars.

(b) The name of the person to whom the parcel is assessed or a statement that it is assessed to unknown owners if that is the case.

(c) The amount of the delinquent installment, interest, and penalty due on the parcel calculated from the date of the call to the date of the sale if the delinquency is on an original unbonded assessment or from the date of delinquency to the date of sale if the delinquency is on an installment of an operation and maintenance assessment, together with a fee, to be determined by the district and the county treasurer, not to exceed the amount necessary to cover the costs incurred by the district and the county treasurer in conducting the sale.

(d) A notice that the parcel assessed will be sold by the county treasurer on the date therein stated, in front of the courthouse of the principal county to pay the amount of the installment with accrued interest, penalty, and costs.

(e) A notice that the sale may be avoided by payment prior thereto of the delinquent installment, penalty, and interest to the date of sale, plus a fee, to be determined by the district and the county treasurer, not to exceed the amount necessary to cover the costs incurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 417, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

51602.

The date of the sale shall be not less than 10 days after the date of the last publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51603.

The county treasurer may postpone the sale for not less than 10 nor more than 30 days at any one time by a written notice posted at the place of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51604.

If, for any reason, a parcel upon which an assessment or any installment thereof is delinquent in whole or in part is not sold at the time or place specified in the notice of sale or to which the sale was postponed, the county treasurer shall publish a new notice of sale and sell the parcel in the manner provided herein for delinquent sales.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51605.

At the time of the sale, the county treasurer shall sell the parcel to himself or herself and his or her successors in office, as trustee for the district, for the amount due on the installment, accrued interest, penalty, and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51606.

If more than one installment of an assessment or more than one assessment on the same parcel is delinquent at the time of the sale, the county treasurer may sell the parcel for the total amount of all installments and assessments then delinquent on the parcel in one sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51607.

The owner of any parcel offered for sale to pay a delinquent assessment or installment thereof may designate in writing to the county treasurer prior to the sale the portion he or she wishes first sold if less than the whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51608.

If the owner fails to designate the portion of the parcel he or she wishes sold for a delinquent assessment, the county treasurer may sell the whole or the least portion of the land that will bring the amount due for the assessment, accrued interest, penalty and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 4.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51611.

A certificate of sale shall be executed by the county treasurer to the county treasurer, as trustee for the district, and the certificate of sale shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county where the parcel described in the certificate is situated. The district shall reimburse the county treasurer for any costs incurred pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 7.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51612.

The certificate of sale is prima facie evidence that:

(a) The parcel was assessed and the assessment duly apportioned as required by law.

(b) The assessment was not paid.

(c) Proper notice of the sale was given and published by the county treasurer. 

(d) The sale was had at the time and place specified in the notice or at the time to which the sale was regularly continued.

(e) All steps and proceedings required to be taken by the county treasurer to make a valid sale were taken.

(f) The deed thereafter made by the county treasurer, duly acknowledged, if no redemption is made, shall be prima facie evidence of the same facts as the certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51612.5.

The county treasurer, at least 60 days prior to the expiration of the redemption period, shall give notice by registered mail of the fact of sale, the purchase price paid, the date of termination of the redemption period, and the fact that a failure to redeem by payment of the purchase price plus interest following the date of the sale, and plus costs incurred as a result of the sale to the county treasurer within the redemption period will result in permanent loss of the property by issuance of a treasurer’s deed. The notice shall be mailed to the owner’s last known address as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll. The notice shall also be mailed to any other person or entity holding an interest in the parcel requesting notice by written instrument identifying the parcel filed with the district office, and mailed to the address specified in the request. The district may impose a charge for each request.

Notwithstanding Section 51646, if the county treasurer fails to give the notice, the redemption period set forth in Section 51646 shall be extended to the date 60 days following the date of mailing of the notice in the manner provided for in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 417, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

51613.

Any person interested in the parcel may redeem it at any time within one year after the sale by paying to the county treasurer the amount for which it was sold, with interest thereon at the rate of 112 percent per month from the date of the sale, together with reasonable costs incurred by the county treasurer and the district as a result of the delinquency sale and redemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 417, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

51614.

When the parcel is redeemed a certificate of redemption shall be issued by the county treasurer to the redemptioner, and the certificate shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

51615.

If no redemption is made within one year, the district is entitled to a deed executed by the county treasurer. The district shall reimburse the county treasurer for any costs incurred pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 8.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51616.

The deed shall convey the parcel free of all liens and encumbrances excepting any prior or subsequent district assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51616.1.

Each installment of an assessment remaining unpaid at the time of the delinquency sale may be called and collected in the manner provided in this part, except that no parcel sold and conveyed to the county treasurer as trustee for the district at the delinquency sale shall, during the period so held, be sold by the county treasurer for delinquent installment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

51616.2.

If a call on an assessment on any parcel sold to the county treasurer as trustee for the district becomes delinquent during the redemption period, the parcel shall be again sold as provided in this article, but only to the county treasurer as trustee for the district, for the amount of the subsequent delinquent installment, interest, and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

51617.

No sale, certificate of sale, or deed made for a valid delinquent assessment shall be adjudged invalid, unless the amount of the delinquent assessment, penalties, interest and costs has been refunded to the purchaser of the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51618.

If, prior to the redemption, the parcel has been sold at a delinquency sale, the money paid by the county treasurer at the sale shall be refunded to him or her upon redemption of the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 322, Sec. 9.   Effective August 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Delinquency Sales on Bonded Assessments [51630. - 51654.]

51630.

When any installment of an assessment called to pay principal and interest on bonds is delinquent, the county treasurer shall publish once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which any of the delinquent land is situated a notice of all the delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51631.

If no newspaper of general circulation is published in the county where the delinquent land is situated, publication shall be made in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51632.

The notice shall contain:

(a) A description of each parcel on which the installment is delinquent, as the description appears on the assessment list or by reference number as set forth in the assessment list on file in the office of the county treasurer (stating the date and time the list was filed) or by other appropriate reference thereto sufficient to identify the parcel, and shall refer to the list for further particulars.

(b) The name of the person to whom the installment is assessed, or a statement that it is assessed to unknown owners if such is the fact.

(c) The amount of the delinquent installment, interest, and penalty due on each parcel.

(d) A notice that each of the parcels will be sold at public auction by the county treasurer in front of the courthouse of the principal county, at a specified day and hour.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 802.)
-------------------------------------------

51633.

If the notice is published in more than one county, each respective notice need include only the matters and things provided in Section 51632 in reference to the delinquent parcel located in the county in which the notice is published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51634.

The date of the sale shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51635.

The county treasurer may continue the sale from day to day by written notice posted at the place of sale to a day not later than the due date of bond principal or interest next following the date of the call.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51636.

The county treasurer shall sell each parcel described in the notice to the highest bidder at the time stated in the notice, or at the time to which the sale is postponed, unless prior thereto he has received payment in full of the delinquent installment and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51637.

The county treasurer shall not accept any bid for any parcel less than the aggregate sum then due on the installment thereon, with penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51638.

Payment for parcels purchased at the sale shall be made in cash or in bonds or interest coupons of the district issued on the assessment and then matured or to mature within 60 days after the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51639.

Bonds or interest coupons tendered in payment for a parcel purchased at a delinquency sale, or the redemption of such a parcel, pursuant to this article shall be accepted at face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51640.

Any bond or coupon received in payment for a parcel purchased at the delinquency sale shall be canceled forthwith by the county treasurer and filed in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51641.

If the entire amount of a bond or coupon tendered in payment for a parcel at the delinquency sale is not required to complete payment of the purchase money, the county treasurer shall endorse thereon as paid, the amount of the purchase money credited thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51642.

If no bid is made for a parcel equal to the amount of the installment delinquent thereon with penalty, the county treasurer shall sell the parcel to himself, as trustee for the district, for the amount of the installment, interest and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51643.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 51644 all money derived from sale of land for delinquent installments of assessments on which bonds have been issued, or from redemption thereof, or from sale of lands bought by the county treasurer at any such sale, shall be paid into the county treasury and credited to the bond fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51644.

After crediting the amount due on the parcel, as shown in the notice of sale, to the bond fund, the county treasurer shall pay to the owner of the parcel any surplus remaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51645.

The county treasurer shall execute to each purchaser, including himself, a certificate of sale, a duplicate of which shall be recorded in the county recorder’s office of the county in which the land is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

51646.

Any person interested in the parcel may redeem it within one year after the date of sale, by paying to the county treasurer for the purchaser a sum equal to the purchase price stated in the certificate with interest thereon at the rate of 112 percent per month from the date of sale to that redemption, either in whole or in part, in cash or in bonds of the district, or their interest coupons, issued on the assessment and then matured, or to mature within 60 days from the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 417, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

51647.

If no redemption is made within one year, the treasurer, upon demand and surrender of the certificate of sale, shall execute to the purchaser, his heirs or assigns, or to himself as trustee of the district if the property was sold to him, a deed to the parcel described in the certificate, conveying the parcel free and clear of all encumbrances except any portion of any reclamation assessment remaining unpaid at the date of the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51648.

The deed shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of the matters therein recited, and of ownership by the grantee of the lands therein described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51649.

Each installment of an assessment remaining unpaid at the time of the delinquent sale may be called and collected in the manner provided in this part, except that no parcel sold and conveyed to the county treasurer as trustee for the district at the delinquency sale shall, during the period so held, be sold by the county treasurer for delinquent installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 802.)
-------------------------------------------

51650.

If a call of an assessment on any parcel sold to the county treasurer as trustee for the district becomes delinquent during the redemption period the parcel shall be again sold as provided in this article, but only to the county treasurer as trustee for the district, for the amount of the subsequent delinquent installment, interest, and penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 802.)
-------------------------------------------

51652.

When the parcel is redeemed a certificate of redemption shall be issued by the county treasurer to the redemptioner, and the certificate shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

51653.

If, prior to the redemption, the parcel has been sold at a delinquency sale, the money paid by the purchaser at such sale shall be refunded to him upon redemption of the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

51654.

No sale, certificate of sale, or deed made for a valid delinquent assessment shall be adjudged invalid, unless the amount of the delinquent assessment, penalties, interest, and costs has been refunded to the purchaser of the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General [51656. - 51656.]

51656.

If a call of an assessment on any parcel sold and conveyed to the county treasurer as trustee for the district pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, becomes delinquent during the periods the parcel is so held and the property is not again sold at a delinquency sale, nevertheless, for the purposes of Chapter 5 of this part, the property shall be considered to have been sold and purchased at delinquency sale by the county treasurer as trustee for the district as of the date of the delinquency for the amount of the delinquent call, penalties and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Unredeemed Property [51660. - 51757.]



  ARTICLE 1. Sale After Expiration of Redemption Period [51660. - 51667.]

51660.

Any parcel purchased by a county treasurer at delinquency sale, as trustee for the district, may, after approval of the board, be sold and conveyed by him at any time after the expiration of the redemption period at public or private sale, with or without notice, to any person paying him the aggregate amount for which the parcel was purchased, with interest thereon at the rate of 7 percent per year, compounded yearly from the date of each delinquency sale, and:

(a) When the parcel was purchased at a sale for the delinquency of an unbonded assessment, any unpaid call that has been made upon any prior or subsequent assessment, with accrued interest and penalties thereon.

(b) When the parcel was purchased at a sale for the delinquency of a bonded assessment, the amount of all subsequent assessments then delinquent, with accrued interest and penalties thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51661.

When the parcel has been purchased for delinquency of a bonded assessment, payment may be made in cash or in matured bonds and coupons issued on the assessment, taken at their face value. Any portion of the purchase price which accrues by reason of a delinquency of an unbonded assessment may be paid only in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

51662.

The county treasurer shall convey parcels purchased by him at a sale for the delinquency of an unbonded assessment, free of all liens and encumbrances except any prior or subsequent district assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51663.

The county treasurer shall convey parcels purchased by him at a sale for the delinquency of a bonded assessment, free of encumbrance except the unpaid balance of the assessment and any other district assessment thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51664.

After the lapse of one year from the expiration of the redemption period the county treasurer may sell the parcel pursuant to Article 2 of this chapter in lieu of selling the parcel as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51665.

The proceeds of sale of parcels acquired by the county treasurer at delinquency sale for bonded assessments, as trustee for the district, shall be deposited in the bond fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51666.

The proceeds of the sale of parcels acquired by the county treasurer as trustee for the district at a delinquency sale for unbonded original and additional assessments shall be credited to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51667.

The proceeds of a sale of parcels acquired by the county treasurer as trustee for the district at a delinquency sale for operation and maintenance assessments shall be credited to the maintenance fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale After One Year After Expiration of Redemption Period [51680. - 51699.]

51680.

After one year from the expiration of the period of redemption of any parcel sold to the county treasurer at a delinquency sale as trustee for the district, the county treasurer, when directed by the board, shall sell all or any part of any parcel remaining unsold to the highest bidder for cash at the front door of the courthouse of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51681.

Parcels purchased at delinquent sale by the county treasurer as trustee for the district shall be offered for sale within three years from the expiration of the redemption period, or before October 1, 1951, whichever period is greater, in parcels of such number of acres as the board may determine will be most desirable for purposes of assuring the sale thereof.

However, such parcels may be retained by the county treasurer as trustee for the district beyond such time so long as the district annually, with respect to such parcels, pays to the county in which such parcels are situated an amount equivalent to taxes levied by such county on similar parcels similarly situated in the county in the same manner as provided in the Revenue and Taxation Code for secured property tax payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

51682.

Notice describing the parcel to be sold and stating the time and place of the sale shall be published once a week for two successive weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which the parcel to be sold, or some portion thereof, is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51683.

It shall be sufficient to describe the parcel to be sold in the notice by reference number as set forth in the assessment lists to which reference is made, by the date and time of filing for further particulars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51684.

One or more parcels may be included in the same notice and sold severally at the time and place set forth in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51685.

Prior to the sale of any parcel, the county treasurer shall cause its fair market value to be ascertained by an appraisal made by a board of appraisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51685.5.

If the total amount of land to be sold at any one sale consists of no more than 50 acres, the board of trustees shall act as the board of appraisement and in such case the provisions of Sections 51685, 51687, 51688, 51689, and 51690 are not applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1247.)
-------------------------------------------

51686.

If the total amount of land to be sold at any one sale consists of more than 50 acres, the board of appraisement shall consist of:

(a) One member who is an officer or an authorized appraiser of a banking corporation formed under the laws of this State, or the manager of a branch bank of such banking corporation, or an officer or cashier of a national banking association, having a place of business in the county in which the parcel or some portion thereof is situated.

(b) One member who is an inheritance tax appraiser of the county in which the parcel is located.

(c) One member, a disinterested person, who is a licensed real estate broker, selected by the two other members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1247.)
-------------------------------------------

51687.

If no such banking corporation or national banking association has a place of business in the county in which the parcel or portion thereof is situated, one member of the board of appraisement shall be an officer or an authorized appraiser, or the manager of a branch bank of such a banking corporation, or an officer or cashier of a national banking association, having a place of business in a county adjacent thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51688.

When all of the members of the board of appraisement cannot agree as to the fair market value of the parcel, the determination of value shall be made in the following manner:

(a) If two of the members of the board agree as to the fair market value, the amount so agreed upon shall constitute the board’s appraisal.

(b) If no two members of the board agree as to the fair market value, then each member of the board shall make a separate appraisal and the average of the three appraisals shall constitute the board’s appraisal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51689.

Each appraisal shall be verified by the members of the board of appraisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51690.

The verfication shall state that:

(a) The appraisal is made in good faith.

(b) The valuation is honestly determined and represents the bona fide opinion of the board.

(c) If any member does not concur in the appraisal, the manner in which the board determined the appraised fair market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51691.

At the time of the sale of a parcel, the county treasurer shall announce its fair market value, as appraised, and shall not accept any bid therefor less than that value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51692.

When a sale is made pursuant to this article, the county treasurer shall execute a deed to the purchaser, upon payment of the price bid, which deed shall have the effect of conveying title to the land sold to the purchaser free of encumbrance, except district assessments, including the unpaid balance of said assessment for the delinquency of which said property was sold, which, upon the date of the sale, had not been called and except as may be otherwise provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51693.

The deed, duly executed and acknowledged, is prima facie evidence that all the proceedings for the levy and collection of the delinquent assessment for which the parcel was sold, and for the sale of the parcel were duly and regularly taken, and all notices required were given and published for the time and manner required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51694.

If any parcel remains unsold for want of an acceptable bid, the county treasurer shall have the parcel reappraised and offer it for sale to the highest bidder for cash in the manner provided in this article, at least once each year until the parcel is sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51695.

If part of any parcel is sold pursuant to this article the assessments thereon shall be reapportioned as provided in Chapter 6, Article 5 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51696.

An action, proceeding, defense, or cross-complaint based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any sale by the county treasurer as trustee of a district of a parcel deeded to him as a result of the nonpayment of an assessment, or some portion thereof, may be commenced or interposed only within one year from the date of the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

51697.

The proceeds of sale of parcels acquired by the county treasurer at delinquency sale for bonded assessments as trustee for the district, shall be deposited in the bond fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51698.

The proceeds of the sale of parcels acquired by the county treasurer as trustee for the district at a delinquency sale for unbonded original and additional assessments shall be credited to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51699.

The proceeds of a sale of parcels acquired by the county treasurer as trustee for the district at a delinquency sale for operation and maintenance assessments shall be credited to the maintenance fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Subdivision and Sale [51720. - 51733.]

51720.

At any time after the expiration of the redemption period, the county treasurer may, after approval of the board, sell and convey, pursuant to this article, a portion of any parcel purchased at delinquency sale by a county treasurer as trustee for the district at public or private sale and with or without notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51721.

Upon receipt of a written offer to purchase a portion of any parcel, the county treasurer shall require the intended purchaser to make a partial payment in cash on the purchase price in an amount not less than fifty dollars ($50) fixed by the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51722.

When the written offer and partial payment are received by the county treasurer he shall notify the board of the offer and intended sale of a portion of the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51723.

When the notification is received the board shall by minute action, approve or disapprove the sale and, in the event of approval, shall reapportion the assessment upon the parcel, including the delinquencies thereon, and penalties and interest, as provided by Chapter 6, Article 5 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51724.

The board shall apportion the costs of making the reapportionment to the several parts into which the parcel is subdivided and between the several assessments upon the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51725.

The board shall set forth in the reapportionment list the date to which the apportioned interest was computed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51726.

The county treasurer, following board approval of the sale and reapportionment shall complete the sale of the subdivided parcel upon payment by the purchaser of the total of the following sums, less the amount of the partial payment made by him:

(a) The sum of delinquencies, penalties and interest apportioned and charged to the subdivided parcel.

(b) Interest on the amount for which the parcel was sold, as apportioned to the parcel, at the rate of 7 percent per year compounded annually from the date set forth in the reapportionment list to which interest was computed, to the date of the sale.

(c) The cost of making the reapportionment as charged to the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

51727.

The balance of the purchase price may be paid in cash or, to the extent that a bonded assessment constitutes a part of the purchase price in cash or in any matured bonds and coupons issued on the reapportioned assessment taken at their face value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51728.

The county treasurer shall execute a deed to the purchaser upon completion of the sale conveying the subdivided parcel free of encumbrances, except the unpaid balance of the reapportioned assessment and any other assessments of the district thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51729.

The partial payment shall be forfeited if the purchaser fails to complete the purchase of the parcel within 20 days after tender of the deed thereto by the county treasurer, and a demand for the balance of the purchase price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51730.

A forfeited partial payment shall be applied first to the costs of making the reapportionment, and any balance thereof shall be deposited in the maintenance fund, or in the general fund if the district has no maintenance fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51731.

The proceeds of sale of subdivided parcels acquired by the county treasurer at delinquency sale for bonded assessments as trustee for the district, shall be deposited in the bond fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51732.

The proceeds of the sale of subdivided parcels acquired by the county treasurer as trustee for the district at a delinquency sale for unbonded original and additional assessments shall be credited to the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

51733.

The proceeds of a sale of subdivided parcels acquired by the county treasurer as trustee for the district at a delinquency sale for operation and maintenance assessments shall be credited to the maintenance fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Possession [51750. - 51757.]

51750.

When the redemption period has expired, and until the sale thereof, the district has the right to the possession of unredeemed parcels purchased at delinquency sale by the county treasurer as trustee for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)